Louisiana, session 2026, SB29.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5713(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5713. Duties; autopsies and investigations
* * *
L.(1) Any autopsy report, as provided for in R.S. 44:19, for a child under
the age of nine who dies unexpectedly without explanation shall include
documentation of any immunizations administered to the child within ninety
days before the child's death. The coroner or any individual contracted to
perform an autopsy on behalf of the coroner, including but not limited to a
forensic pathologist or his designee, shall be granted access to the child's
immunization records in the state immunization registry.
(2) If the coroner finds that the cause of death was Sudden Infant Death
Syndrome, Sudden Unexpected Infant Death, Sudden Arrhythmic Death
Syndrome, or Sudden Death in the Young, he shall report the case to the
Louisiana Department of Health. The Louisiana Department of Health shall
report the case to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the
National Institutes of Health's Sudden Unexpected Infant Death and Sudden
Death in the Young Case Registry.
(3) The inclusion of an immunization record in any report shall not
imply cause of death.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 29 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 40:31.14(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§31.14. Authorization of release of immunization records
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, immunization
records for use in an immunization registry shall not be considered privileged
communications between a healthcare provider and patient when such records are
used in accordance with the provisions of this Part. The Louisiana Department of
Health, public health units and their agents, providers, coroners or any individual
contracted to perform an autopsy on behalf of a coroner, parents or guardians,
schools, and early learning centers may obtain information from, or provide
information to, the immunization record of a client of any immunization registry
without the written consent of a client.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.